dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="søta__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ann__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anni</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ennene</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enner</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/okk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ekkene</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ekker</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okka</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okkene</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okker</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okki</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okk</l>
          <r>okk<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gen/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eraa</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eraa</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erai</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usa</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usa</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uset</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usi</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usi</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oa</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oa</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oet</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oi</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oi</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørne</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ør</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skyldm/ark__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arka</l>
          <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arki</l>
          <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ark</l>
          <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erkene</l>
          <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erker</l>
          <r>ark<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pen/ny__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cane</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nyane</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nyar</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nyen</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="undertann"><i>undert</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tro"><i>tr</i><par n="t/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="støyttann"><i>støytt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvitann"><i>tvit</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stifttann"><i>stiftt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vesla"><i>vesla</i><par n="søta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrangtvitann"><i>vrangtvit</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="visdomstann"><i>visdomst</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyrnetann"><i>hyrnet</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eitertann"><i>eitert</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høveltann"><i>høvelt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framtann"><i>framt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="augnetann"><i>augnet</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gifttann"><i>giftt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elefanttann"><i>elefantt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dokk"><i>d</i><par n="d/okk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="augetann"><i>auget</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gulltann"><i>gullt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjørnetann"><i>hjørnet</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="holtann"><i>holt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskelita"><i>fiskelita</i><par n="søta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoggtann"><i>hoggt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overtann"><i>overt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skyldmark"><i>skyldm</i><par n="skyldm/ark__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skovltann"><i>skovlt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smiledokk"><i>smiled</i><par n="d/okk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sagtann"><i>sagt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvalrosstann"><i>kvalrosst</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laustann"><i>laust</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kinntann"><i>kinnt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knutetann"><i>knutet</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mjølketann"><i>mjølket</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
